Connecticut, session 2026, SB00139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 10-76ggg of the general statutes be amended to increase
the appropriation of the special education and expansion development
grant by one hundred ninety-one million dollars for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027.